Kentucky, session 2025RS, SB191.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 342.0011 is amended to read as follows:
As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:
(1) "Injury" means any work-related traumatic event or series of traumatic events,
including cumulative trauma, arising out of and in the course of employment which
is the proximate cause producing a harmful change in the human organism
evidenced by objective medical findings. "Injury" does not include the effects of the
natural aging process, and does not include any communicable disease unless the
risk of contracting the disease is increased by the nature of the employment.
"Injury" when used generally, unless the context indicates otherwise, shall include
an occupational disease and damage to a prosthetic appliance, but shall not include
a psychological, psychiatric, or stress-related change in the human organism, unless
it is a direct result of a physical injury or is a diagnosis of class 2 or greater post-
traumatic stress disorder, diagnosed under the latest version of the Diagnostic
and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders and determined according to the
Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment, stemming from a death or
threatened death by direct exposure to oneself or witnessing the death, threat of
death, or its immediate aftermath;
(2) "Occupational disease" means a disease arising out of and in the course of the
employment;
(3) An occupational disease as defined in this chapter shall be deemed to arise out of
the employment if there is apparent to the rational mind, upon consideration of all
the circumstances, a causal connection between the conditions under which the
work is performed and the occupational disease, and which can be seen to have
followed as a natural incident to the work as a result of the exposure occasioned by
the nature of the employment and which can be fairly traced to the employment as
Page 1 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
the proximate cause. The occupational disease shall be incidental to the character of
the business and not independent of the relationship of employer and employee. An
occupational disease need not have been foreseen or expected but, after its
contraction, it must appear to be related to a risk connected with the employment
and to have flowed from that source as a rational consequence;
(4) "Injurious exposure" shall mean that exposure to occupational hazard which would,
independently of any other cause whatsoever, produce or cause the disease for
which the claim is made;
(5) "Death" means death resulting from an injury or occupational disease;
(6) "Carrier" means any insurer, or legal representative thereof, authorized to insure the
liability of employers under this chapter and includes a self-insurer;
(7) "Self-insurer" is an employer who has been authorized under the provisions of this
chapter to carry his or her own liability on his or her employees covered by this
chapter;
(8) "Department" means the Department of Workers' Claims in the Education and
Labor Cabinet;
(9) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of the Department of Workers' Claims
under the direction and supervision of the secretary of the Education and Labor
Cabinet;
(10) "Board" means the Workers' Compensation Board;
(11) (a) "Temporary total disability" means the condition of an employee who has not
reached maximum medical improvement from an injury and has not reached a
level of improvement that would permit a return to employment;
(b) "Permanent partial disability" means the condition of an employee who, due
to an injury, has a permanent disability rating but retains the ability to work;
and
(c) "Permanent total disability" means the condition of an employee who, due to
Page 2 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
an injury, has a permanent disability rating and has a complete and permanent
inability to perform any type of work as a result of an injury, except that total
disability shall be irrebuttably presumed to exist for an injury that results in:
1. Total and permanent loss of sight in both eyes;
2. Loss of both feet at or above the ankle;
3. Loss of both hands at or above the wrist;
4. Loss of one (1) foot at or above the ankle and the loss of one (1) hand at
or above the wrist;
5. Permanent and complete paralysis of both arms, both legs, or one (1)
arm and one (1) leg;
6. Incurable insanity or imbecility; or
7. Total loss of hearing;
(12) "Income benefits" means payments made under the provisions of this chapter to the
disabled worker or his or her dependents in case of death, excluding medical and
related benefits;
(13) "Medical and related benefits" means payments made for medical, hospital, burial,
and other services as provided in this chapter, other than income benefits;
(14) "Compensation" means all payments made under the provisions of this chapter
representing the sum of income benefits and medical and related benefits;
(15) "Medical services" means medical, surgical, dental, hospital, nursing, and medical
rehabilitation services, medicines, and fittings for artificial or prosthetic devices;
(16) "Person" means any individual, partnership, limited partnership, limited liability
company, firm, association, trust, joint venture, corporation, or legal representative
thereof;
(17) "Wages" means, in addition to money payments for services rendered, the
reasonable value of board, rent, housing, lodging, fuel, or similar advantages
received from the employer, and gratuities received in the course of employment
Page 3 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
from persons other than the employer as evidenced by the employee's federal and
state tax returns;
(18) "Agriculture" means the operation of farm premises, including the planting,
cultivation, producing, growing, harvesting, and preparation for market of
agricultural or horticultural commodities thereon, the raising of livestock for food
products and for racing purposes, and poultry thereon, and any work performed as
an incident to or in conjunction with the farm operations, including the sale of
produce at on-site markets and the processing of produce for sale at on-site markets.
It shall not include the commercial processing, packing, drying, storing, or canning
of such commodities for market, or making cheese or butter or other dairy products
for market;
(19) "Beneficiary" means any person who is entitled to income benefits or medical and
related benefits under this chapter;
(20) "United States," when used in a geographic sense, means the several states, the
District of Columbia, the Commonwealth of Puerto Rico, the Canal Zone, and the
territories of the United States;
(21) "Alien" means a person who is not a citizen, a national, or a resident of the United
States or Canada. Any person not a citizen or national of the United States who
relinquishes or is about to relinquish his or her residence in the United States shall
be regarded as an alien;
(22) "Insurance carrier" means every insurance carrier or insurance company authorized
to do business in the Commonwealth writing workers' compensation insurance
coverage and includes the Kentucky Employers Mutual Insurance Authority and
every self-insured group operating under the provisions of this chapter;
(23) (a) "Severance or processing of coal" means all activities performed in the
Commonwealth at underground, auger, and surface mining sites; all activities
performed at tipple or processing plants that clean, break, size, or treat coal;
Page 4 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
and all activities performed at coal loading facilities for trucks, railroads, and
barges. Severance or processing of coal shall not include acts performed by a
final consumer if the acts are performed at the site of final consumption.
(b) "Engaged in severance or processing of coal" shall include all individuals,
partnerships, limited partnerships, limited liability companies, corporations,
joint ventures, associations, or any other business entity in the Commonwealth
which has employees on its payroll who perform any of the acts stated in
paragraph (a) of this subsection, regardless of whether the acts are performed
as owner of the coal or on a contract or fee basis for the actual owner of the
coal. A business entity engaged in the severance or processing of coal,
including but not limited to administrative or selling functions, shall be
considered wholly engaged in the severance or processing of coal for the
purpose of this chapter. However, a business entity which is engaged in a
separate business activity not related to coal, for which a separate premium
charge is not made, shall be deemed to be engaged in the severance or
processing of coal only to the extent that the number of employees engaged in
the severance or processing of coal bears to the total number of employees.
Any employee who is involved in the business of severing or processing of
coal and business activities not related to coal shall be prorated based on the
time involved in severance or processing of coal bears to his or her total time;
(24) "Premium" for every self-insured group means any and all assessments levied on its
members by such group or contributed to it by the members thereof. For special
fund assessment purposes, "premium" also includes any and all membership dues,
fees, or other payments by members of the group to associations or other entities
used for underwriting, claims handling, loss control, premium audit, actuarial, or
other services associated with the maintenance or operation of the self-insurance
group;
Page 5 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(25) (a) "Premiums received" for policies effective on or after January 1, 1994, for
insurance companies means direct written premiums as reported in the annual
statement to the Department of Insurance by insurance companies, except that
"premiums received" includes premiums charged off or deferred, and, on
insurance policies or other evidence of coverage with provisions for
deductibles, the calculated cost for coverage, including experience
modification and premium surcharge or discount, prior to any reduction for
deductibles. The rates, factors, and methods used to calculate the cost for
coverage under this paragraph for insurance policies or other evidence of
coverage with provisions for deductibles shall be the same rates, factors, and
methods normally used by the insurance company in Kentucky to calculate
the cost for coverage for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage
without provisions for deductibles, except that, for insurance policies or other
evidence of coverage with provisions for deductibles effective on or after
January 1, 1995, the calculated cost for coverage shall not include any
schedule rating modification, debits, or credits. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates on or after January 1, 1995, assessments
shall be imposed on premiums received as calculated by the deductible
program adjustment. The cost for coverage calculated under this paragraph by
insurance companies that issue only deductible insurance policies in Kentucky
shall be actuarially adequate to cover the entire liability of the employer for
compensation under this chapter, including all expenses and allowances
normally used to calculate the cost for coverage. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates of May 6, 1993, through December 31,
1993, for which the insurance company did not report premiums and remit
special fund assessments based on the calculated cost for coverage prior to the
reduction for deductibles, "premiums received" includes the initial premium
Page 6 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
plus any reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, and fees charged
under the deductibles. The special fund assessment rates in effect for
reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, or fees charged under the
deductibles shall be those percentages in effect on the effective date of the
insurance policy. For policies covering covered employees having a co-
employment relationship with a professional employer organization and a
client as defined in KRS Chapter 336, "premiums received" means premiums
calculated using the experience modification factor of each client as defined
in KRS Chapter 336 for each covered employee for that portion of the payroll
pertaining to the covered employee.
(b) "Direct written premium" for insurance companies means the gross premium
written less return premiums and premiums on policies not taken but
including policy and membership fees.
(c) "Premium," for policies effective on or after January 1, 1994, for insurance
companies means all consideration, whether designated as premium or
otherwise, for workers' compensation insurance paid to an insurance company
or its representative, including, on insurance policies with provisions for
deductibles, the calculated cost for coverage, including experience
modification and premium surcharge or discount, prior to any reduction for
deductibles. The rates, factors, and methods used to calculate the cost for
coverage under this paragraph for insurance policies or other evidence of
coverage with provisions for deductibles shall be the same rates, factors, and
methods normally used by the insurance company in Kentucky to calculate
the cost for coverage for insurance policies or other evidence of coverage
without provisions for deductibles, except that, for insurance policies or other
evidence of coverage with provisions for deductibles effective on or after
January 1, 1995, the calculated cost for coverage shall not include any
Page 7 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
schedule rating modifications, debits, or credits. For policies with provisions
for deductibles with effective dates on or after January 1, 1995, assessments
shall be imposed as calculated by the deductible program adjustment. The cost
for coverage calculated under this paragraph by insurance companies that
issue only deductible insurance policies in Kentucky shall be actuarially
adequate to cover the entire liability of the employer for compensation under
this chapter, including all expenses and allowances normally used to calculate
the cost for coverage. For policies with provisions for deductibles with
effective dates of May 6, 1993, through December 31, 1993, for which the
insurance company did not report premiums and remit special fund
assessments based on the calculated cost for coverage prior to the reduction
for deductibles, "premium" includes the initial consideration plus any
reimbursements invoiced for losses, expenses, or fees charged under the
deductibles.
(d) "Return premiums" for insurance companies means amounts returned to
insureds due to endorsements, retrospective adjustments, cancellations,
dividends, or errors.
(e) "Deductible program adjustment" means calculating premium and premiums
received on a gross basis without regard to the following:
1. Schedule rating modifications, debits, or credits;
2. Deductible credits; or
3. Modifications to the cost of coverage from inception through and
including any audit that are based on negotiated retrospective rating
arrangements, including but not limited to large risk alternative rating
options;
(26) "Insurance policy" for an insurance company or self-insured group means the term
of insurance coverage commencing from the date coverage is extended, whether a
Page 8 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
new policy or a renewal, through its expiration, not to exceed the anniversary date
of the renewal for the following year;
(27) "Self-insurance year" for a self-insured group means the annual period of
certification of the group created pursuant to KRS 342.350(4) and 304.50-010;
(28) "Premium" for each employer carrying his or her own risk pursuant to KRS
342.340(1) shall be the projected value of the employer's workers' compensation
claims for the next calendar year as calculated by the commissioner using
generally-accepted actuarial methods as follows:
(a) The base period shall be the earliest three (3) calendar years of the five (5)
calendar years immediately preceding the calendar year for which the
calculation is made. The commissioner shall identify each claim of the
employer which has an injury date or date of last injurious exposure to the
cause of an occupational disease during each one (1) of the three (3) calendar
years to be used as the base, and shall assign a value to each claim. The value
shall be the total of the indemnity benefits paid to date and projected to be
paid, adjusted to current benefit levels, plus the medical benefits paid to date
and projected to be paid for the life of the claim, plus the cost of medical and
vocational rehabilitation paid to date and projected to be paid. Adjustment to
current benefit levels shall be done by multiplying the weekly indemnity
benefit for each claim by the number obtained by dividing the statewide
average weekly wage which will be in effect for the year for which the
premium is being calculated by the statewide average weekly wage in effect
during the year in which the injury or date of the last exposure occurred. The
total value of the claims using the adjusted weekly benefit shall then be
calculated by the commissioner. Values for claims in which awards have been
made or settlements reached because of findings of permanent partial or
permanent total disability shall be calculated using the mortality and interest
Page 9 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
discount assumptions used in the latest available statistical plan of the
advisory rating organization defined in Subtitle 13 of KRS Chapter 304. The
sum of all calculated values shall be computed for all claims in the base
period;
(b) The commissioner shall obtain the annual payroll for each of the three (3)
years in the base period for each employer carrying his or her own risk from
records of the department and from the records of the Department of
Workforce Development, Education and Labor Cabinet. The commissioner
shall multiply each of the three (3) years of payroll by the number obtained by
dividing the statewide average weekly wage which will be in effect for the
year in which the premium is being calculated by the statewide average
weekly wage in effect in each of the years of the base period;
(c) The commissioner shall divide the total of the adjusted claim values for the
three (3) year base period by the total adjusted payroll for the same three (3)
year period. The value so calculated shall be multiplied by 1.25 and shall then
be multiplied by the employer's most recent annualized payroll, calculated
using records of the department and the Department of Workforce
Development data which shall be made available for this purpose on a
quarterly basis as reported, to obtain the premium for the next calendar year
for assessment purposes under KRS 342.122;
(d) For November 1, 1987, through December 31, 1988, premium for each
employer carrying its own risk shall be an amount calculated by the board
pursuant to the provisions contained in this subsection and such premium
shall be provided to each employer carrying its own risk and to the funding
commission on or before January 1, 1988. Thereafter, the calculations set
forth in this subsection shall be performed annually, at the time each employer
applies or renews its application for certification to carry its own risk for the
Page 10 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
next twelve (12) month period and submits payroll and other data in support
of the application. The employer and the funding commission shall be notified
at the time of the certification or recertification of the premium calculated by
the commissioner, which shall form the employer's basis for assessments
pursuant to KRS 342.122 for the calendar year beginning on January 1
following the date of certification or recertification;
(e) If an employer having fewer than five (5) years of doing business in this state
applies to carry its own risk and is so certified, its premium for the purposes
of KRS 342.122 shall be based on the lesser number of years of experience as
may be available including the two (2) most recent years if necessary to create
a three (3) year base period. If the employer has less than two (2) years of
operation in this state available for the premium calculation, then its premium
shall be the greater of the value obtained by the calculation called for in this
subsection or the amount of security required by the commissioner pursuant to
KRS 342.340(1);
(f) If an employer is certified to carry its own risk after having previously insured
the risk, its premium shall be calculated using values obtained from claims
incurred while insured for as many of the years of the base period as may be
necessary to create a full three (3) year base. After the employer is certified to
carry its own risk and has paid all amounts due for assessments upon
premiums paid while insured, the employer shall be assessed only upon the
premium calculated under this subsection;
(g) "Premium" for each employer defined in KRS 342.630(2) shall be calculated
as set forth in this subsection; and
(h) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, the premium of any
employer authorized to carry its own risk for purposes of assessments due
under this chapter shall be no less than thirty cents ($0.30) per one hundred
Page 11 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
dollars ($100) of the employer's most recent annualized payroll for employees
covered by this chapter;
(29) "SIC code" as used in this chapter means the Standard Industrial Classification
Code contained in the latest edition of the Standard Industrial Classification Manual
published by the Federal Office of Management and Budget;
(30) "Investment interest" means any pecuniary or beneficial interest in a provider of
medical services or treatment under this chapter, other than a provider in which that
pecuniary or investment interest is obtained on terms equally available to the public
through trading on a registered national securities exchange, such as the New York
Stock Exchange or the American Stock Exchange, or on the National Association
of Securities Dealers Automated Quotation System;
(31) "Managed health care system" means a health care system that employs gatekeeper
providers, performs utilization review, and does medical bill audits;
(32) "Physician" means physicians and surgeons, psychologists, optometrists, dentists,
podiatrists, and osteopathic and chiropractic practitioners acting within the scope of
the license or other credentials required by his or her specialty of practice in the
United States jurisdiction in which he or she is authorized to practice;
(33) "Objective medical findings" means information gained through direct observation
and testing of the patient applying objective or standardized methods;
(34) "Work" means providing services to another in return for remuneration on a regular
and sustained basis in a competitive economy;
(35) "Permanent impairment rating" means percentage of whole body impairment
caused by the injury or occupational disease as determined by the ["]Guides to the
Evaluation of Permanent Impairment["];
(36) "Permanent disability rating" means the permanent impairment rating selected by
an administrative law judge times the factor set forth in the table that appears at
KRS 342.730(1)(b);[ and]
Page 12 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(37) "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent Impairment" means, except as provided in
KRS 342.262:
(a) The fifth edition published by the American Medical Association; and
(b) For psychological impairments, Chapter 12 of the second edition published by
the American Medical Association; and
(38) "Medical professional" means physicians, audiologists holding a doctorate in
audiology, surgeons, psychologists, optometrists, dentists, podiatrists, and
osteopathic and chiropractic practitioners, clinicians with a master's level degree
as a physician associate or physician assistant, and clinicians with a master's or
doctoral level degree with advanced clinical training that designates the
individual as a nurse practitioner authorized to practice medicine as certified by
any applicable board or duly licensed in any state in the United States.
Section 2. KRS 342.020 is amended to read as follows:
(1) In addition to all other compensation provided in this chapter, the employer shall
pay for the cure and relief from the effects of an injury or occupational disease the
medical, surgical, and hospital treatment, including nursing, medical, and surgical
supplies and appliances, as may reasonably be required at the time of the injury and
thereafter for the length of time set forth in this section, or as may be required for
the cure and treatment of an occupational disease.
(2) In claims resulting in an award of permanent total disability or resulting from an
injury described in subsection (9) of this section, the employer's obligation to pay
the benefits specified in this section shall continue for so long as the employee is
disabled regardless of the duration of the employee's income benefits.
(3) (a) In all permanent partial disability claims not involving an injury described in
subsection (9) of this section, the employer's obligation to pay the benefits
specified in this section shall continue for seven hundred eighty (780) weeks
from the date of injury or date of last exposure.
Page 13 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(b) In all permanent partial disability claims not involving an injury described in
subsection (9) of this section, the commissioner shall, in writing, advise the
employee of the right to file an application for the continuation of benefits as
described in this section. This notice shall be made to the employee seven
hundred fifty-four (754) weeks from the date of injury or last exposure.
(c) An employee shall receive a continuation of benefits as described in this
section for additional time beyond the period provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection as long as continued medical treatment is reasonably necessary and
related to the work injury or occupational disease if:
1. An application is filed within seventy-five (75) days prior to the
termination of the seven hundred eighty (780) week period;
2. The employee demonstrates that continued medical treatment is
reasonably necessary and related to the work injury or occupational
disease; and
3. An administrative law judge determines and orders that continued
benefits are reasonably necessary and related to the work injury or
occupational disease for additional time beyond the original seven
hundred eighty (780) week period provided in paragraph (a) of this
subsection.
(d) 1. If the administrative law judge determines that medical benefits are not
reasonably necessary or not related to the work injury or occupational
disease, or if an employee fails to make proper application for continued
benefits within the time period provided in paragraph (c) of this
subsection, any future medical treatment shall be deemed to be unrelated
to the work injury and the employer's obligation to pay medical benefits
shall cease permanently.
2. In determining whether a medical benefit is reasonably necessary, the
Page 14 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
administrative law judge may rely upon an objective medical opinion
or objective medical data in addition to the practice parameters or
evidence-based treatment guidelines developed or adopted by the
commissioner under Section 4 of this Act. When medical treatment is
denied by a carrier or a third-party administrator and any portion of
the denial is based upon the treatment guidelines developed or adopted
by the commissioner, the treatment guidelines being relied upon shall
be set forth in full in the denial and the specific guidelines shall be
provided in full to the employee and medical provider.
(4) (a) In the absence of designation of a managed health care system by the
employer, the employee may select medical providers to treat his or her
injury or occupational disease.
(b) Even if the employer has designated a managed health care system, the
injured employee may elect to continue treating with a physician who
provided emergency medical care or treatment to the employee.
(c) Except as provided by paragraph (d) of this subsection, the employer,
insurer, or payment obligor acting on behalf of the employer, shall make all
payments for services rendered to an employee directly to the provider of the
services within thirty (30) days of receipt of a statement for services.
(d) The requirement for the employer, insurer, or payment obligor to pay a
medical provider within thirty (30) days of receipt of the statement of
services does not apply until after the carrier has accepted the claim as
compensable or after there has been an initial determination of
compensability by an administrative law judge, whichever occurs first. In
addition, the commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations
establishing conditions under which the thirty (30) day period for payment
may be tolled.
Page 15 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(e) Except as provided in paragraph (f) of this subsection, the provider of
medical services shall submit the statement for services within forty-five (45)
days of the day treatment is initiated and every forty-five (45) days thereafter,
if appropriate, as long as medical services are rendered.
(f) The requirement for the medical provider to submit a statement for services
within forty-five (45) days of when the treatment is rendered does not apply
until after the injured worker and the medical provider have received
notification from the employer, insurer, or medical payment obligor that the
claim has been determined to be compensable, or there has been an initial
determination of compensability by an administrative law judge, whichever
first occurs. To be effective, the notice of compensability shall advise the
injured worker and the medical provider of any necessary information
regarding the process by which and the location where statements for
services shall be sent.[ Except as provided in subsection (7) of this section,
in]
(g) In no event shall a medical fee exceed the limitations of an adopted medical
fee schedule or other limitations contained in KRS 342.035, whichever is
lower.
(h) The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations establishing the
form and content of a statement for services and procedures by which disputes
relative to the necessity, effectiveness, frequency, and cost of services may be
resolved.
(i) If the employee prevails in a medical fee dispute, he or she shall be entitled
to attorney's fees not to exceed one hundred fifty dollars ($150) per hour,
subject to the limitations provided in Section 11 of this Act. The employee
may submit a bill of costs detailing any expenses to be considered by the
administrative law judge.
Page 16 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(5) Notwithstanding any provision of the Kentucky Revised Statutes to the contrary,
medical services and treatment provided under this chapter shall not be subject to
copayments or deductibles.
(6) Employers may provide medical services through a managed health care system.
The managed health care system shall file with the Department of Workers' Claims
a plan for the rendition of health care services for work-related injuries and
occupational diseases to be approved by the commissioner pursuant to
administrative regulations promulgated by the commissioner.
(7) All managed health care systems rendering medical services under this chapter shall
include the following features in plans for workers' compensation medical care:
(a) Copayments or deductibles shall not be required for medical services rendered
in connection with a work-related injury or occupational disease;
(b) The employee shall be allowed choice of provider within the plan;
(c) The managed health care system shall provide an informal procedure for the
expeditious resolution of disputes concerning rendition of medical services;
(d) The employee shall be allowed to obtain a second opinion, at the employer's
expense, from an outside physician if a managed health care system physician
recommends surgery;
(e) The employee may obtain medical services from providers outside the
managed health care system, at the employer's expense, when treatment is
unavailable through the managed health care system;
(f) The managed health care system shall establish procedures for utilization
review of medical services to assure that a course of treatment is reasonably
necessary; diagnostic procedures are not unnecessarily duplicated; the
frequency, scope, and duration of treatment is appropriate; pharmaceuticals
are not unnecessarily prescribed; and that ongoing and proposed treatment is
not experimental, cost ineffective, or harmful to the employee; and
Page 17 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(g) Statements for services shall be audited regularly to assure that charges are
not duplicated and do not exceed those authorized in the applicable fee
schedules.
(h) A schedule of fees for all medical services to be provided under this chapter
which shall not be subject to the limitations on medical fees contained in this
chapter.
(i) Restrictions on provider selection imposed by a managed health care system
authorized by this chapter shall not apply to emergency medical care.
(8) Except for emergency medical care, medical services rendered pursuant to this
chapter shall be under the supervision of a single treating physician or physicians'
group having the authority to make referrals, as reasonably necessary, to
appropriate facilities and specialists. The employee may change his or her
designated physician one (1) time and thereafter shall show reasonable cause in
order to change physicians.
(9) When a compensable injury or occupational disease results in the amputation or
partial amputation of an arm, hand, leg, or foot, or the loss of hearing, or the
enucleation of an eye or loss of teeth, or permanent total or permanent partial
paralysis, the employer shall pay for, in addition to the other medical, surgical, and
hospital treatment enumerated in subsection (1) and this subsection, a modern
artificial member and, where required, proper braces as may reasonably be required
at the time of the injury and thereafter during disability.
(10) Upon motion of the employer, with sufficient notice to the employee for a response
to be filed, if it is shown to the satisfaction of the administrative law judge by
affidavits or testimony that, because of the physician selected by the employee to
treat the injury or disease, or because of the hospital selected by the employee in
which treatment is being rendered, that the employee is not receiving proper
medical treatment and the recovery is being substantially affected or delayed; or
Page 18 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
that the funds for medical expenses are being spent without reasonable benefit to
the employee; or that because of the physician selected by the employee or because
of the type of medical treatment being received by the employee that the employer
will substantially be prejudiced in any compensation proceedings resulting from the
employee's injury or disease; then the administrative law judge may allow the
employer to select a physician to treat the employee and the hospital or hospitals in
which the employee is treated for the injury or disease. No action shall be brought
against any employer subject to this chapter by any person to recover damages for
malpractice or improper treatment received by any employee from any physician,
hospital, or attendant thereof.
(11) An employee who reports an injury alleged to be work-related or files an
application for adjustment of a claim shall execute a waiver and consent of any
physician-patient, psychiatrist-patient, or chiropractor-patient privilege with respect
to any condition or complaint reasonably related to the condition for which the
employee claims compensation. Notwithstanding any other provision in the
Kentucky Revised Statutes, any physician, psychiatrist, chiropractor, podiatrist,
hospital, or health care provider shall, within a reasonable time after written request
by the employee, employer, workers' compensation insurer, special fund, uninsured
employers' fund, or the administrative law judge, provide the requesting party with
any information or written material reasonably related to any injury or disease for
which the employee claims compensation.
(12) When a provider of medical services or treatment, required by this chapter, makes
referrals for medical services or treatment by this chapter, to a provider or entity in
which the provider making the referral has an investment interest, the referring
provider shall disclose that investment interest to the employee, the commissioner,
and the employer's insurer or the party responsible for paying for the medical
services or treatment, within thirty (30) days from the date the referral was made.
Page 19 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(13) (a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, the employer,
insurer, or payment obligor shall not be liable for urine drug screenings of
patients in excess of:
1. One (1) per year for a patient considered to be low-risk;
2. Two (2) per year for a patient considered to be moderate-risk; and
3. Four (4) per year for patients considered to be high-risk;
based upon the screening performed by the treating medical provider and
other pertinent factors.
(b) The employer, insurer, or payment obligor may be liable for urine drug
screening at each office visit for patients that have exhibited aberrant behavior
documented by multiple lost prescriptions, multiple requests for early refills
of prescriptions, multiple providers prescribing or dispensing opioids or
opioid substitutes as evidenced by the electronic monitoring system
established in KRS 218A.202 or a similar system, unauthorized dosage
escalation, or apparent intoxication.
(c) The employer, insurer, or payment obligor may request additional urine drug
screenings which shall not count toward the maximum number of drug
screenings enumerated in paragraph (a) of this subsection.
(d) The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations related to urine
drug screenings as part of the practice parameters or treatment guidelines
required under KRS 342.035.
(14) (a) As used in this subsection, "practice of pharmacy" has the same meaning as in
KRS 315.010.
(b) In addition to all other compensation that may be reimbursed to a pharmacist
under this chapter, the employer, insurer, or payment obligor shall be liable
for the reimbursement of a pharmacist for a service or procedure at a rate not
less than that provided to other nonphysician practitioners if the service or
Page 20 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
procedure:
1. Is within the scope of the practice of pharmacy;
2. Would otherwise be compensable under this chapter if the service or
procedure were provided by a:
a. Physician;
b. Advanced practice registered nurse; or
c. Physician assistant; and
3. Is performed by the pharmacist in strict compliance with laws and
administrative regulations related to the pharmacist's license.
Section 3. KRS 342.033 is amended to read as follows:
(1) As used in this section, medical professionals shall include
individuals["physician" means physicians and surgeons, psychologists,
optometrists, dentists, podiatrists, and osteopathic and chiropractic practitioners]
acting within the scope of the license or other credentials required by their[his or
her] specialty of practice in the United States jurisdiction in which they are[he or
she is] authorized to practice, and any retired physicians[physician] previously
authorized to practice in the Commonwealth of Kentucky, who surrendered
their[his or her] license while in good standing with their respective licensing board
and was not subject to an ongoing investigation for improper practices.
(2) In a claim for benefits, no party may introduce direct testimony from more than two
(2) medical professionals[physicians] without prior consent from the administrative
law judge. The motion requesting additional testimony shall clearly demonstrate the
need for such additional testimony. A party may introduce direct testimony from a
medical professional[physician] through a written medical report. The report shall
become a part of the evidentiary record, subject to the right of an adverse party to
object to the admissibility of the report and to cross-examine the reporting medical
professional[physician]. The commissioner shall promulgate administrative
Page 21 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
regulations prescribing the format and content of written medical reports.
Section 4. KRS 342.035 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Periodically, the commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations to adopt
a schedule of fees for the purpose of ensuring that all fees, charges, and
reimbursements under KRS 342.020 and this section shall be fair, current, and
reasonable and shall be limited to such charges as are fair, current, and reasonable
for similar treatment of injured persons in the same community for like services,
where treatment is paid for by general health insurers. In determining what fees are
reasonable, the commissioner may also consider the increased security of payment
afforded by this chapter. On or before November 1, 1994, and on July 1 every two
(2) years thereafter, the schedule of fees contained in administrative regulations
promulgated pursuant to this section shall be reviewed and updated, if appropriate.
Within ten (10) days of April 4, 1994, the commissioner shall execute a contract
with an appropriately qualified consultant pursuant to which each of the following
elements within the workers' compensation system are evaluated; the methods of
health care delivery; quality assurance and utilization mechanisms; type, frequency,
and intensity of services; risk management programs; and the schedule of fees
contained in administrative regulation. The consultant shall present
recommendations based on its review to the commissioner not later than sixty (60)
days following execution of the contract. The commissioner shall consider these
recommendations and, not later than thirty (30) days after their receipt, promulgate
a regulation which shall be effective on an emergency basis, to effect a twenty-five
percent (25%) reduction in the total medical costs within the program.
(2) A[No] provider of medical services or treatment required by this chapter, its agent,
servant, employee, assignee, employer, or independent contractor acting on behalf
of any medical provider, shall not knowingly collect, attempt to collect, coerce, or
attempt to coerce, directly or indirectly, the payment of any charge, for services
Page 22 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
covered by a workers' compensation insurance plan for the treatment of a work-
related injury or occupational disease, in excess of that provided by a schedule of
fees, or cause the credit of any employee to be impaired by reason of the
employee's failure or refusal to pay the excess charge. When an administrative law
judge determines a statement for services is not compensable because it was
submitted more than forty-five (45) days after the treatment date, the medical
provider shall not seek payment from the employee or the employee's legal
counsel. In addition to the penalty imposed in KRS 342.990 for violations of this
subsection, any individual who sustains damages by any act in violation of the
provisions of this subsection shall have a civil cause of action in Circuit Court to
enjoin further violations and to recover the actual damages sustained by the
individual, together with the costs of the lawsuit, including a reasonable attorney's
fee.
(3) Where these requirements are furnished by a public hospital or other institution,
payment thereof shall be made to the proper authorities conducting it. No
compensation shall be payable for the death or disability of an employee if his or
her death is caused, or if and insofar as his or her disability is aggravated, caused,
or continued, by an unreasonable failure to submit to or follow any competent
surgical treatment or medical aid or advice.
(4) The commissioner shall, by December 1, 1994, promulgate administrative
regulations to adopt a schedule of fees for the purpose of regulating charges by
medical providers and other health care professionals for testimony presented and
medical reports furnished in the litigation of a claim by an injured employee against
the employer. The workers' compensation medical fee schedule for physicians, 803
KAR 25:089, having an effective date of February 9, 1995, shall remain in effect
until July 1, 1996, or until the effective date of any amendments promulgated by the
commissioner, whichever occurs first, it being determined that this administrative
Page 23 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
regulation is within the statutory grant of authority, meets legislative intent, and is
not in conflict with the provisions of this chapter. The medical fee schedule and
amendments shall be fair, current, and reasonable and otherwise comply with this
section.
(5) (a) To ensure compliance with subsections (1) and (4) of this section, the
commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations by December 31,
1994, which require each insurance carrier, self-insured group, and self-
insured employer to certify to the commissioner the program or plan it has
adopted to ensure compliance.
(b) In addition, the commissioner shall periodically have an independent audit
conducted by a qualified independent person, firm, company, or other entity
hired by the commissioner, in accordance with the personal service contract
provisions contained in KRS 45A.690 to 45A.725, to ensure that the
requirements of subsection (1) of this section are being met. The independent
person, firm, company, or other entity selected by the commissioner to
conduct the audit shall protect the confidentiality of any information it
receives during the audit, shall divulge information received during the audit
only to the commissioner, and shall use the information for no other purpose
than the audit required by this paragraph.
(c) The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations governing
medical provider utilization review activities conducted by an insurance
carrier, self-insured group, or self-insured employer pursuant to this chapter.
Utilization review required under administrative regulations may be waived if
the insurance carrier, self-insured group, or self-insured employer agrees that
the recommended medical treatment is medically necessary and appropriate or
if the injured employee elects not to proceed with the recommended medical
treatment.
Page 24 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(d) Periodically, or upon request, the commissioner shall report to the Interim
Joint Committee on Economic Development and Workforce Investment of the
Legislative Research Commission or to the corresponding standing
committees of the General Assembly, as appropriate, the degree of
compliance or lack of compliance with the provisions of this section and make
recommendations thereon.
(e) The cost of implementing and carrying out the requirements of this subsection
shall be paid from funds collected pursuant to KRS 342.122.
(6) The commissioner may promulgate administrative regulations incorporating
managed care or other concepts intended to reduce costs or to speed the delivery or
payment of medical services to employees receiving medical and related benefits
under this chapter.
(7) For purposes of this chapter, any medical provider shall charge only its customary
fee for photocopying requested documents. However, in no event shall a
photocopying fee of a medical provider or photocopying service exceed fifty cents
($0.50) per page. However, a medical provider shall not charge a fee when the
initial copy of medical records is provided to the injured worker or his or her
attorney in response to a written request pursuant to KRS 422.317. In addition,
there shall be no charge for reviewing any records of a medical provider, during
regular business hours, by any party who is authorized to review the records and
who requests a review pursuant to this chapter.
(8) (a) The commissioner shall develop or adopt practice parameters or evidence-
based treatment guidelines for medical treatment for use by medical providers
under this chapter, including but not limited to chronic pain management
treatment and opioid use, and promulgate administrative regulations in order
to implement the developed or adopted practice parameters or evidenced-
based treatment guidelines on or before December 31, 2019. The
Page 25 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
commissioner may adopt any parameters for medical treatment as developed
and updated by the federal Agency for Health Care Policy Research, or the
commissioner may adopt other parameters for medical treatment which are
developed by qualified bodies, as determined by the commissioner, with
periodic updating based on data collected during the application of the
parameters.
(b) The commissioner shall develop or adopt a pharmaceutical formulary for
medications prescribed for the cure of and relief from the effects of a work
injury or occupational disease and promulgate administrative regulations to
implement the developed or adopted pharmaceutical formulary on or before
December 31, 2018.
(c) Any provider of medical services under this chapter who has followed the
practice parameters or treatment guidelines or formularies developed or
adopted and implemented pursuant to this subsection shall be presumed to
have met the appropriate legal standard of care in medical malpractice cases
regardless of any unanticipated complication that may thereafter develop or be
discovered.
(9) (a) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, the medical fee
schedule adopted under subsection (4) of this section shall require all worker's
compensation insurance carriers, worker's compensation self-insured groups,
and worker's compensation self-insured employers to provide coverage and
payment for surgical first assisting services to registered nurse first assistants
as defined in KRS 216B.015.
(b) The provisions of this subsection apply only if reimbursement for an assisting
physician would be covered and a registered nurse first assistant who
performed the services is used as a substitute for the assisting physician. The
reimbursement shall be made directly to the registered nurse first assistant if
Page 26 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
the claim is submitted by a registered nurse first assistant who is not an
employee of the hospital or the surgeon performing the services.
Section 5. KRS 342.125 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Upon motion by any party or upon an administrative law judge's own motion, an
administrative law judge may reopen and review any award or order on any of the
following grounds:
(a) Fraud;
(b) Newly-discovered evidence which could not have been discovered with the
exercise of due diligence;
(c) Mistake;[ and]
(d) Change of disability as shown by objective medical evidence of worsening or
improvement of impairment due to a condition caused by the injury since the
date of the award or order; and
(e) Consideration of a post-award request for vocational rehabilitation
necessitated by the work injury or disease.
(2) No claim which has been previously dismissed or denied on the merits shall be
reopened except upon the grounds set forth in this section.
(3) Except for reopening solely for determination of the compensability of medical
expenses, fraud, entitlement to rehabilitation as set forth in KRS 342.710, or
conforming the award as set forth in KRS 342.730(1)(c)2., or for reducing a
permanent total disability award when an employee returns to work, or seeking
temporary total disability benefits during the period of an award, no claim shall be
reopened more than four (4) years following the date of the original award or
original order granting or denying benefits, when such an award or order becomes
final and nonappealable, and no party may file a motion to reopen within one (1)
year of any previous motion to reopen by the same party. Orders granting or
denying benefits that are entered subsequent to an original final award or order
Page 27 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
granting or denying benefits shall not be considered to be an original order granting
or denying benefits under this subsection and shall not extend the time to reopen a
claim beyond four (4) years following the date of the final, nonappealable original
award or original order.
(4) Reopening and review under this section shall be had upon notice to the parties and
in the same manner as provided for an initial proceeding under this chapter. Upon
reopening, the administrative law judge may end, diminish, or increase
compensation previously awarded, within the maximum and minimum provided in
this chapter, or change or revoke a previous order. The administrative law judge
shall immediately send all parties a copy of the subsequent order or award.
Reopening shall not affect the previous order or award as to any sums already paid
thereunder, and any change in the amount of compensation shall be ordered only
from the date of filing the motion to reopen. No employer shall suspend benefits
during pendency of any reopening procedures except upon order of the
administrative law judge.
(5) (a) Upon the application of the affected employee, and a showing of progression
of his or her previously-diagnosed occupational pneumoconiosis resulting
from exposure to coal dust and development of respiratory impairment due to
that pneumoconiosis and two (2) additional years of employment in the
Commonwealth wherein the employee was continuously exposed to the
hazards of the disease, the administrative law judge may review an award or
order for benefits attributable to coal-related pneumoconiosis under KRS
342.732. An application for review under this subsection shall be made within
one (1) year of the date the employee knew or reasonably should have known
that a progression of his or her disease and development or progression of
respiratory impairment have occurred. Review under this subsection shall
include a review of all evidence admitted in all prior proceedings.
Page 28 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(b) Benefits awarded as a result of a review under this subsection shall be reduced
by the amount of retraining incentive benefits or income benefits previously
awarded under KRS 342.732. The amount to be deducted shall be subtracted
from the total amount awarded, and the remaining amount shall be divided by
the number of weeks, for which the award was made, to arrive at the weekly
benefit amount which shall be apportioned in accordance with the provisions
of KRS 342.316.
(6) In a reopening or review proceeding where there has been additional permanent
partial disability awarded, the increase shall not extend the original period, unless
the combined prior disability and increased disability exceeds fifty percent (50%),
but less than one hundred percent (100%), in which event the awarded period shall
not exceed five hundred twenty (520) weeks, from commencement date of the
original disability previously awarded. The law in effect on the date of the original
injury controls the rights of the parties.
(7) Where an agreement has become an award by approval of the administrative law
judge, and a reopening and review of that award is initiated, no statement contained
in the agreement, whether as to jurisdiction, liability of the employer, nature and
extent of disability, or as to any other matter, shall be considered by the
administrative law judge as an admission against the interests of any party. The
parties may raise any issue upon reopening and review of this type of award which
could have been considered upon an original application for benefits.
(8) The time limitation prescribed in this section shall apply to all claims irrespective of
when they were incurred, or when the award was entered, or the settlement
approved. However, claims decided prior to December 12, 1996, may be reopened
within four (4) years of the award or order or within four (4) years of December 12,
1996, whichever is later, provided that the exceptions to reopening established in
subsections (1) and (3) of this section shall apply to these claims as well.
Page 29 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
Section 6. KRS 342.276 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall establish a program to provide an opportunity for
mediation of disputes as to the entitlement to benefits under this chapter.
(2) The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance with
KRS Chapter 13A necessary to establish and implement the mediation program,
which shall:
(a) Prescribe[ prescribe] the qualifications and duties of mediators;
(b) Establish a process for the designation of mediators;
(c) Establish procedures for the conduct of mediation proceedings;
(d) Establish[ and] the issues which shall be subject to mediation; and
(e) Require a statement of the party or parties seeking mediation for the
resolution of contested issues that at least one (1) prior attempt has been
made to reach a settlement prior to mediation.
(3) Recommendations by mediators are without administrative or judicial authority and
are not binding on the parties unless the parties enter into a settlement agreement
incorporating the recommendations. Administrative law judges may participate in
the mediation process but shall not issue findings or orders as a result of the process
unless agreed to by the parties.
Section 7. KRS 342.281 is amended to read as follows:
Within fourteen (14) days from the date of the award, order, or decision any party may
file a petition for reconsideration of the award, order, or decision of the administrative
law judge. The petition for reconsideration shall clearly set out the errors relied upon with
the reasons and argument for reconsideration of the pending award, order, or decision.
All other parties shall have ten (10) days thereafter to file a response to the petition. The
administrative law judge shall be limited in the review to the correction of errors patently
appearing upon the face of the award, order, or decision and shall overrule the petition for
reconsideration or make any correction within ten (10) days after submission. After an
Page 30 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
order on reconsideration has been rendered, subsequent petitions for reconsideration
shall not toll or extend the time to file an appeal unless the subsequent petition for
reconsideration is filed to correct a patent error in the order.
Section 8. KRS 342.310 is amended to read as follows:
(1) If any administrative law judge, the board, or any court before whom any
proceedings are brought under this chapter determines that such proceedings have
been brought, prosecuted, or defended without reasonable ground, he, she or it may
assess the whole cost of the proceedings which shall include actual expenses but not
be limited to the following: court costs, travel expenses, deposition costs, physician
expenses for attendance fees at depositions, attorney fees, and all other out-of-
pocket expenses upon the party who has so brought, prosecuted, or defended them.
(2) If any administrative law judge, the board, or any court before whom any
proceedings are brought under this chapter determines that a party has committed
acts in violation of KRS 342.335(1) or (2), that party may be ordered to make
restitution for any compensation paid as a result of the commission of such acts.
(3) If an administrative law judge determines a medical dispute was filed frivolously
or for the purpose of harassment by an employer, its third-party administrator, or
the responsible insurer, in addition to the attorney's fees in subsection (4)(i)
Section 2 of this Act, the administrative law judge may fine the employer an
amount not less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and not more than five
thousand dollars ($5,000) to be paid to the employee.
Section 9. KRS 342.315 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For workers who have had injuries or occupational hearing loss, the
commissioner shall contract with the University of Kentucky,[ and] the
University of Louisville, and the University of Pikeville medical schools to
evaluate workers. For workers who have become affected by occupational
hearing loss, audiologists holding a doctorate in audiology affiliated with
Page 31 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
the University of Kentucky, the University of Louisville, or the University of
Pikeville medical schools may perform hearing loss evaluations. For
workers who have become affected by occupational diseases, the
commissioner shall contract with the University of Kentucky,[ and] the
University of Louisville, and the University of Pikeville medical schools.
(b) In cases alleging coal workers' pneumoconiosis, in addition to the medical
schools listed in this subsection, the commissioner may contract with
medical professionals who are[, or other physicians otherwise] duly qualified
as "B" readers[ who are licensed in the Commonwealth] and who are board-
certified pulmonary specialists.
(c) Referral for evaluation may be made whenever a medical question is at issue.
Medical professionals affiliated with the University of Kentucky, the
University of Louisville, or the University of Pikeville medical schools may
perform the evaluations.
(2) The medical professionals[physicians] and institutions performing evaluations
pursuant to this section shall render reports encompassing their findings and
opinions in the form prescribed by the commissioner. Except as otherwise provided
in KRS 342.316, the clinical findings and opinions of the designated evaluator shall
be afforded presumptive weight by administrative law judges and the burden to
overcome such findings and opinions shall fall on the opponent of that evidence.
When administrative law judges reject the clinical findings and opinions of the
designated evaluator, they shall specifically state in the order the reasons for
rejecting that evidence.
(3) The commissioner or an administrative law judge may, upon the application of any
party or upon his or her own motion, direct appointment by the commissioner,
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section, of an[a medical] evaluator to make any
necessary medical examination of the employee. The[Such medical] evaluator shall
Page 32 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
file with the commissioner within fifteen (15) days after such examination a written
report. The appointed evaluator[medical evaluator appointed] may charge a
reasonable fee not exceeding fees established by the commissioner for those
services.
(4) Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of a statement for the evaluation, the employer
or carrier shall pay the cost of the examination. Upon notice from the commissioner
that an evaluation has been scheduled, the insurance carrier shall forward within
seven (7) days to the employee the expenses of travel necessary to attend the
evaluation at a rate equal to that paid to state employees for travel by private
automobile while conducting state business.
(5) Upon claims in which it is finally determined that the injured worker was not the
employee at the time of injury of an employer covered by this chapter, the special
fund shall reimburse the carrier for any evaluation performed pursuant to this
section for which the carrier has been erroneously compelled to make payment.
(6) Not less often than annually the designee of the secretary of the Cabinet for Health
and Family Services shall assess the performance of the medical schools and render
findings as to whether evaluations conducted under this section are being rendered
in a timely manner, whether examinations are conducted in accordance with
medically recognized techniques, whether impairment ratings are in conformity
with standards prescribed by the "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent
Impairment," and whether coal workers' pneumoconiosis examinations are
conducted in accordance with the standards prescribed in this chapter.
(7) The General Assembly finds that good public policy mandates the realization of the
potential advantages, both economic and effectual, of the use of telehealth. The
commissioner may, to the extent that he or she finds it feasible and appropriate,
require the use of telehealth, as defined in KRS 211.332, in the independent medical
evaluation process required by this chapter.
Page 33 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
Section 10. KRS 342.316 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) The employer liable for compensation for occupational disease shall be the
employer in whose employment the employee was last exposed to the hazard
of the occupational disease. During any period in which this section is
applicable to a coal mine, an operator who acquired it or substantially all of its
assets from a person who was its operator on and after January 1, 1973, shall
be liable for, and secure the payment of, the benefits which would have been
payable by the prior operator under this section with respect to miners
previously employed in the mine if it had not been acquired by such later
operator. At the same time, however, this subsection does not relieve the prior
operator of any liability under this section. Also, it does not affect whatever
rights the later operator might have against the prior operator.
(b) The time of the beginning of compensation payments shall be the date of the
employee's last injurious exposure to the cause of the disease, or the date of
actual disability, whichever is later.
(2) The procedure with respect to the giving of notice and determination of claims in
occupational disease cases and the compensation and medical benefits payable for
disability or death due to the disease shall be the same as in cases of accidental
injury or death under the general provisions of this chapter, except that notice of
claim shall be given to the employer as soon as practicable after the employee first
experiences a distinct manifestation of an occupational disease in the form of
symptoms reasonably sufficient to apprise the employee that he or she has
contracted the disease, or a diagnosis of the disease is first communicated to him or
her, whichever shall first occur.
(3) The procedure for filing occupational disease claims shall be as follows:
(a) The application for resolution of claim shall set forth the complete work
history of the employee with a concise description of injurious exposure to a
Page 34 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
specific occupational disease, together with the name and addresses of the
employer or employers with the approximate dates of employment. The
application shall also include at least one (1) written medical report
supporting his or her claim. This medical report shall be made on the basis of
clinical or X-ray examination performed in accordance with accepted medical
standards and shall contain full and complete statements of all examinations
performed and the results thereof. The report shall be made by a duly-licensed
medical professional[physician]. The commissioner shall promulgate
administrative regulations which prescribe the format of the medical report
required by this section and the manner in which the report shall be
completed.
1. For coal-related occupational pneumoconiosis claims, each clinical
examination shall include a chest X-ray interpretation by a National
Institute of Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) certified "B"
reader. The chest X-ray upon which the report is made shall be filed
with the application as well as spirometric tests when pulmonary
dysfunction is alleged.
2. For other compensable occupational pneumoconiosis claims, each
clinical examination shall include a chest X-ray examination and
appropriate pulmonary function tests.
(b) To be admissible, medical evidence offered in any proceeding under this
chapter for determining a claim for occupational pneumoconiosis resulting
from exposure to coal dust shall comply with accepted medical standards as
follows:
1. Chest X-rays shall be of acceptable quality with respect to exposure and
development and shall be indelibly labeled with the date of the X-ray
and the name and Social Security number of the claimant. Reports by
Page 35 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
medical professionals[Physicians' reports] of X-ray interpretations
shall:
a. Identify[ identify] the claimant by name and Social Security
number;
b. Include[ include] the date of the X-ray and the date of the report;
and
c. Classify[ classify] the X-ray interpretation using the latest ILO
Classification and be accompanied by a completed copy of the
latest ILO Classification report.
Only interpretations by National Institute of Occupational Safety and
Health (NIOSH) certified "B" readers shall be admissible.
2. Spirometric testing shall be conducted in accordance with the standards
recommended in the "Guides to the Evaluation of Permanent
Impairment" and the 1978 ATS epidemiology standardization project
with the exception that the predicted normal values for lung function
shall not be adjusted based upon the race of the subject. The FVC or the
FEV1 values shall represent the largest of such values obtained from
three (3) acceptable forced expiratory volume maneuvers as corrected to
BTPS (body temperature, ambient pressure and saturated with water
vapor at these conditions) and the variance between the two (2) largest
acceptable FVC values shall be either less than five percent (5%) of the
largest FVC value or less than one hundred (100) milliliters, whichever
is greater. The variance between the two (2) largest acceptable FEV1
values shall be either less than five percent (5%) of the largest FEV1
value or less than one hundred (100) milliliters, whichever is greater.
Reports of spirometric testing shall include a description by the
physician of the procedures utilized in conducting such spirometric
Page 36 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
testing and a copy of the spirometric chart and tracings from which
spirometric values submitted as evidence were taken. If it is shown that
the spirometric testing is not valid due to inadequate cooperation or poor
effort on the part of the claimant, the claimant's right to take or
prosecute any proceedings under this chapter shall be suspended until
the refusal or obstruction ceases. No compensation shall be payable for
the period during which the refusal or obstruction continues.
3. The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations pursuant
to KRS Chapter 13A as necessary to effectuate the purposes of this
section. The commissioner shall periodically review the applicability of
the spirometric test values contained in the "Guides to the Evaluation of
Permanent Impairment" and may by administrative regulation substitute
other spirometric test values which are found to be more closely
representative of the normal pulmonary function of the coal mining
population.
4. The procedure for determination of occupational disease claims shall be
as follows:
a. Immediately upon receipt of an application for resolution of claim,
the commissioner shall notify the responsible employer and all
other interested parties and shall furnish them with a full and
complete copy of the application.
b. The commissioner shall assign the claim to an administrative law
judge and shall promptly refer the employee to a duly qualified
medical professional who is board certified in the area
concerning the alleged occupational disease, and in the case of
claims for coal workers' pneumoconiosis to a medical
professional duly who is qualified as a "B" reader[ physician who
Page 37 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
is licensed in the Commonwealth] and who is a board-certified
pulmonary specialist as set forth pursuant to KRS 342.315 and
342.794(1). The report from this examination shall be provided to
all parties of record. The employee shall not be referred by the
commissioner for examination within two (2) years following any
prior referral for examination for the same disease.
c. The commissioner shall develop a procedure to annually audit the
performance of medical professionals[physicians] and facilities
that are selected to perform examinations pursuant to this section.
The audit shall include an evaluation of the medical
professional[physician] and facility with respect to the timeliness
and completeness of the reports and the frequency at which the
medical professional's[physician's] classification of an X-ray
differs from those of the other medical professionals[physicians]
of that X-ray. The commissioner shall remove a medical
professional[physician] or facility from selection consideration if
the medical professional[physician] or facility consistently
renders incomplete or untimely reports or if the X-ray[physician's]
interpretations[ of X-rays] are not in conformity with the readings
of other medical professionals[physicians] of record at least fifty
percent (50%) of the time. The report required under this
subdivision shall be provided to the Interim Joint Committee on
Economic Development and Workforce Investment on or before
July 1, 2019, and on or before July 1 of each year thereafter.
d. In coal workers' pneumoconiosis claims, if the medical
professional[physician] selected by the commissioner interprets an
X-ray as positive for complicated coal workers' pneumoconiosis,
Page 38 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
the commissioner shall refer the employee to the facility at which
the claimant was previously evaluated for a computerized
tomography scan in order to verify the findings. The computerized
tomography scan shall be interpreted by the facility and a report
shall be filed with the commissioner. The employer, insurer, or
payment obligor shall pay the cost of the examination pursuant to
the medical fee schedule. The administrative law judge may rely
upon the findings in the report in accepting or rejecting ILO
radiographic evidence of the disease required under KRS 342.732
for benefit determination.
e. Within forty-five (45) days following the notice of filing an
application for resolution of claim, the employer or carrier shall
notify the commissioner and all parties of record of its acceptance
or denial of the claim. A denial shall be in writing and shall state
the specific basis for the denial.
f. The administrative law judge shall conduct such proceedings as
are necessary to resolve the claim and shall have authority to grant
or deny any relief, including interlocutory relief, to order
additional proof, to conduct a benefit review conference, or to take
such other action as may be appropriate to resolve the claim.
g. Unless a voluntary settlement is reached by the parties, or the
parties agree otherwise, the administrative law judge shall issue a
written determination within sixty (60) days following a hearing.
The written determination shall address all contested issues and
shall be enforceable under KRS 342.305.
h. Within thirty (30) days of the receipt of the statement for the
evaluation, the employer, insurer, or payment obligor shall pay the
Page 39 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
cost of the examination. Upon notice from the commissioner that
an evaluation has been scheduled, the employer, insurer, or
payment obligor shall forward the expenses of travel necessary to
attend the evaluation at the state employee reimbursement rates to
the employee within seven (7) days. However, if the employee has
alleged a pulmonary dysfunction but has not filed spirometric
evidence as required by paragraph (a) of this subsection at the time
the evaluation is scheduled by the commissioner, the employee
will be responsible for fifty percent (50%) of the cost of the
evaluation.
5. The procedure for appeal from a determination of an administrative law
judge shall be as set forth in KRS 342.285.
(4) (a) The right to compensation under this chapter resulting from an occupational
disease shall be forever barred unless a claim is filed with the commissioner
within three (3) years after the last injurious exposure to the occupational
hazard or after the employee first experiences a distinct manifestation of an
occupational disease in the form of symptoms reasonably sufficient to apprise
the employee that he or she has contracted the disease, whichever shall last
occur; and if death results from the occupational disease within that period,
unless a claim therefor be filed with the commissioner within three (3) years
after the death; but that notice of claim shall be deemed waived in case of
disability or death where the employer, or its insurance carrier, voluntarily
makes payment therefor, or if the incurrence of the disease or the death of the
employee and its cause was known to the employer. However, the right to
compensation for any occupational disease shall be forever barred, unless a
claim is filed with the commissioner within five (5) years from the last
injurious exposure to the occupational hazard, except that, in cases of
Page 40 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
radiation disease, asbestos-related disease, or a type of cancer specified in
KRS 61.315(11)(b), a claim must be filed within twenty (20) years from the
last injurious exposure to the occupational hazard.
(b) Income benefits for the disease of pneumoconiosis resulting from exposure to
coal dust or death therefrom shall not be payable unless the employee has
been exposed to the hazards of such pneumoconiosis in the Commonwealth of
Kentucky over a continuous period of not less than two (2) years during the
ten (10) years immediately preceding the date of his or her last exposure to
such hazard, or for any five (5) of the fifteen (15) years immediately
preceding the date of such last exposure.
(5) The amount of compensation payable for disability due to occupational disease or
for death from the disease, and the time and manner of its payment, shall be as
provided for under the general provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act, but:
(a) In no event shall the payment exceed the amounts that were in effect at the
time of the last injurious exposure;
(b) The time of the beginning of compensation payments shall be the date of the
employee's last injurious exposure to the cause of the disease, or the date of
actual disability, whichever is later; and
(c) In case of death where the employee has been awarded compensation or made
timely claim within the period provided for in this section, and an employee
has suffered continuous disability to the date of his or her death occurring at
any time within twenty (20) years from the date of disability, his or her
dependents, if any, shall be awarded compensation for his or her death as
provided for under the general provisions of the Workers' Compensation Act
and in this section, except as provided in KRS 342.750(6).
(6) If an autopsy has been performed, no testimony relative thereto shall be admitted
unless the employer or its representative has available findings and reports of the
Page 41 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
pathologist or doctor who performed the autopsy examination.
(7) No compensation shall be payable for occupational disease if the employee at the
time of entering the employment of the employer by whom compensation would
otherwise be payable, falsely represented himself or herself, in writing, as not
having been previously disabled, laid-off, or compensated in damages or otherwise,
because of the occupational disease, or failed or omitted truthfully to state to the
best of his or her knowledge, in answer to written inquiry made by the employer,
the place, duration, and nature of previous employment, or, to the best of his or her
knowledge, the previous state of his or her health.
(8) No compensation for death from occupational disease shall be payable to any
person whose relationship to the deceased, which under the provisions of this
chapter would give right to compensation, arose subsequent to the beginning of the
first compensable disability, except only for after-born children of a marriage
existing at the beginning of such disability.
(9) Whenever any claimant misconceives his or her remedy and files an application for
adjustment of claim under the general provisions of this chapter and it is
subsequently discovered, at any time before the final disposition of the cause, that
the claim for injury, disability, or death which was the basis for his or her
application should properly have been made under the provisions of this section,
then the application so filed may be amended in form or substance, or both, to
assert a claim for injury, disability, or death under the provisions of this section, and
it shall be deemed to have been so filed as amended on the date of the original filing
thereof, and compensation may be awarded that is warranted by the whole evidence
pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. When amendment of this type is
submitted, further or additional evidence may be heard when deemed necessary.
Nothing this section contains shall be construed to be or permit a waiver of any of
the provisions of this chapter with reference to notice of time for filing of a claim,
Page 42 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
but notice of filing a claim, if given or done, shall be deemed to be a notice of filing
of a claim under provisions of this chapter, if given or done within the time required
by this subsection.
(10) When an employee has an occupational disease that is covered by this chapter, the
employer in whose employment he or she was last injuriously exposed to the hazard
of the disease, and the employer's insurance carrier, if any, at the time of the
exposure, shall alone be liable therefor, without right to contribution from any prior
employer or insurance carrier, except as otherwise provided in this chapter.
(11) (a) For claims filed on or before June 30, 2017, income benefits for coal-related
occupational pneumoconiosis shall be paid fifty percent (50%) by the
Kentucky coal workers' pneumoconiosis fund as established in KRS 342.1242
and fifty percent (50%) by the employer in whose employment the employee
was last exposed to the hazard of that occupational disease.
(b) Income benefits for coal-related occupational pneumoconiosis for claims filed
after June 30, 2017, shall be paid by the employer in whose employment the
employee was last exposed to the hazards of coal workers' pneumoconiosis.
(c) Compensation for all other occupational disease shall be paid by the employer
in whose employment the employee was last exposed to the hazards of the
occupational disease.
(12) A concluded claim for benefits by reason of contraction of coal workers'
pneumoconiosis in the severance or processing of coal shall bar any subsequent
claim for benefits by reason of contraction of coal workers' pneumoconiosis, unless
there has occurred in the interim between the conclusion of the first claim and the
filing of the second claim at least two (2) years of employment wherein the
employee was continuously exposed to the hazards of the disease in the
Commonwealth.
Section 11. KRS 342.320 is amended to read as follows:
Page 43 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(1) All fees of attorneys and medical professionals[physicians], and all charges of
hospitals under this chapter, shall be subject to the approval of an administrative
law judge pursuant to the statutes and administrative regulations.
(2) In an original claim, attorney's fees for services under this chapter on behalf of an
employee shall be subject to the following maximum limits:
(a) For attorney-client employment contracts entered into and signed after July
14, 2000, but before July 14, 2018, twenty percent (20%) of the first twenty-
five thousand dollars ($25,000) of the award, fifteen percent (15%) of the next
ten thousand dollars ($10,000), and five percent (5%) of the remainder of the
award, not to exceed a maximum fee of twelve thousand dollars ($12,000).
This fee shall be paid by the employee from the proceeds of the award or
settlement; and
(b) For attorney-client employment contracts entered into and signed on or after
July 14, 2018, twenty percent (20%) of the first twenty-five thousand dollars
($25,000) of the award, fifteen percent (15%) of the next twenty-five
thousand dollars ($25,000), and ten percent (10%) of the remainder of the
award, not to exceed a maximum fee of eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000).
This fee shall be paid by the employee from the proceeds of the award or
settlement.
(3) In approving an allowance of attorney's fees, the administrative law judge shall
consider the extent, complexity, and quality of services rendered, and in the case of
death, the Remarriage Tables of the Dutch Royal Insurance Institute. An attorney's
fee may be denied or reduced upon proof of solicitation by the attorney. However,
this provision shall not be construed to preclude advertising in conformity with
standards prescribed by the Kentucky Supreme Court.
(4) No attorney's fee in any case involving benefits under this chapter shall be paid
until the fee is approved by the administrative law judge, and any contract for the
Page 44 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
payment of attorney's fees otherwise than as provided in this section shall be void.
The motion for approval of an attorney's fee shall be submitted within thirty (30)
days following finality of the claim. Except when the attorney's fee is to be paid by
the employer or carrier, the attorney's fee shall be paid in one (1) of the following
ways:
(a) The employee may pay the attorney's fee out of his or her personal funds or
from the proceeds of a lump-sum settlement; or
(b) The administrative law judge, upon request of the employee, may order the
payment of the attorney's fee in a lump sum directly to the attorney of record
and deduct the attorney's fee from the weekly benefits payable to the
employee in equal installments over the duration of the award or until the
attorney's fee has been paid, commuting sufficient sums to pay the fee.
(5) At the commencement of the attorney-client relationship, the attorney shall explain
to the employee the methods by which this section provides for the payment of the
attorney's fee, and the employee shall select the method in which the attorney's fee
is to be paid. His or her selection and statement that he or she fully understands the
method to be used shall be submitted by his or her attorney, on a notarized form
signed by the employee, at the time the motion for approval of the attorney's fee is
submitted. The commissioner shall develop the format and content of the form to be
used pursuant to this section. The form to be used shall list on its face all options
permitted in this section for the payment of an attorney's fees and contain an
explanation in nontechnical language of each method.
(6) In a claim that has been reopened pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, an
attorney's fee may be awarded by the administrative law judge subject to the limits
set forth in subsection (2) of this section. In awarding the attorney's fee, the
administrative law judge shall consider the factors set forth in subsection (3) of this
section. If no additional amount is recovered upon reopening, no attorney's fee shall
Page 45 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
be awarded. No attorney's fee shall be allowed or approved exceeding the amounts
provided in subsection (2)(a) of this section applicable to any additional amount
recovered.
(7) Attorney's fees for representing employers in proceedings under this chapter
pursuant to contract with the employer shall be subject to approval of the
administrative law judge in the same manner as prescribed for attorney
representation of employees. Employer attorney's fees are subject to the limitation
of eighteen thousand dollars ($18,000) maximum fees except that fees for
representing employers shall not be dependent upon the result achieved. Employer
attorney's fees may be paid on a periodic basis while a claim is adjudicated and the
payments need not be approved until the claims resolution process is completed. All
such approved fees shall be paid by the employer and in no event shall exceed the
amount the employer agreed by contract to pay.
(8) The commissioner shall promulgate administrative regulations in accordance
with KRS Chapter 13A establishing a schedule of fees that may be charged by
court reporters for services rendered pursuant to KRS Chapter 342.
Section 12. KRS 342.730 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Except as provided in KRS 342.732, income benefits for disability shall be paid to
the employee as follows:
(a) For temporary or permanent total disability, sixty-six and two-thirds percent
(66-2/3%) of the employee's average weekly wage but not more than one
hundred ten percent (110%) of the state average weekly wage and not less
than twenty percent (20%) of the state average weekly wage as determined in
KRS 342.740 during that disability. Nonwork-related impairment and
conditions compensable under KRS 342.732 and hearing loss covered in KRS
342.7305 shall not be considered in determining whether the employee is
totally disabled for purposes of this subsection.
Page 46 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
(b) For permanent partial disability, sixty-six and two-thirds percent (66-2/3%) of
the employee's average weekly wage but not more than eighty-two and one-
half percent (82.5%) of the state average weekly wage as determined by KRS
342.740, multiplied by the permanent impairment rating caused by the injury
or occupational disease as determined by the "Guides to the Evaluation of
Permanent Impairment," times the factor set forth in the table that follows:
AMA Impairment Factor
0 to 5% 0.65
6 to 10% 0.85
11 to 15% 1.00
16 to 20% 1.00
21 to 25% 1.15
26 to 30% 1.35
31 to 35% 1.50
36% and above 1.70
Any temporary total disability period within the maximum period for
permanent, partial disability benefits shall extend the maximum period but
shall not make payable a weekly benefit exceeding that determined in
subsection (1)(a) of this section. Notwithstanding any section of this chapter
to the contrary, there shall be no minimum weekly income benefit for
permanent partial disability and medical benefits shall be paid for the duration
of the disability.
(c) 1. If, due to an injury, an employee does not retain the physical capacity to
return to the type of work that the employee performed at the time of
injury, the benefit for permanent partial disability shall be multiplied by
three (3) times the amount otherwise determined under paragraph (b) of
this subsection, but this provision shall not be construed so as to extend
Page 47 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
the duration of payments; or
2. If an employee returns to work at a weekly wage equal to or greater than
the average weekly wage at the time of injury, the weekly benefit for
permanent partial disability shall be determined under paragraph (b) of
this subsection for each week during which that employment is
sustained. During any period of cessation of that employment,
temporary or permanent, for any reason, with or without cause, payment
of weekly benefits for permanent partial disability during the period of
cessation shall be two (2) times the amount otherwise payable under
paragraph (b) of this subsection. This provision shall not be construed so
as to extend the duration of payments.
3. Recognizing that limited education and advancing age impact an
employee's post-injury earning capacity, an education and age factor,
when applicable, shall be added to the income benefit multiplier set
forth in paragraph (c)1. of this subsection. If at the time of injury, the
employee had less than eight (8) years of formal education, the
multiplier shall be increased by four-tenths (0.4); if the employee had
less than twelve (12) years of education or a high school Equivalency
diploma, the multiplier shall be increased by two-tenths (0.2); if the
employee was age sixty (60) or older, the multiplier shall be increased
by six-tenths (0.6); if the employee was age fifty-five (55) or older, the
multiplier shall be increased by four-tenths (0.4); or if the employee was
age fifty (50) or older, the multiplier shall be increased by two-tenths
(0.2).
4. Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 342.125, a claim may be
reopened at any time during the period of permanent partial disability in
order to conform the award payments with the requirements of
Page 48 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
subparagraph 2. of this paragraph.
(d) For permanent partial disability, if an employee has a permanent disability
rating of fifty percent (50%) or less as a result of a work-related injury, the
compensable permanent partial disability period shall be four hundred twenty-
five (425) weeks, and if the permanent disability rating is greater than fifty
percent (50%), the compensable permanent partial disability period shall be
five hundred twenty (520) weeks from the date the impairment or disability
exceeding fifty percent (50%) arises. Benefits payable for permanent partial
disability shall not exceed ninety-nine percent (99%) of sixty-six and two-
thirds percent (66-2/3%) of the employee's average weekly wage as
determined under KRS 342.740 and shall not exceed eighty-two and one-half
percent (82.5%) of the state average weekly wage, except for benefits payable
pursuant to paragraph (c)1. of this subsection, which shall not exceed one
hundred ten percent (110%) of the state average weekly wage, nor shall
benefits for permanent partial disability be payable for a period exceeding five
hundred twenty (520) weeks, notwithstanding that multiplication of
impairment times the factor set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection would
yield a greater percentage of disability.
(e) For permanent partial disability, impairment for nonwork-related disabilities,
conditions previously compensated under this chapter, conditions covered by
KRS 342.732, and hearing loss covered in KRS 342.7305 shall not be
considered in determining the extent of disability or duration of benefits under
this chapter.
(2) The period of any income benefits payable under this section on account of any
injury shall be reduced by the period of income benefits paid or payable under this
chapter on account of a prior injury if income benefits in both cases are for
disability of the same member or function, or different parts of the same member or
Page 49 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
function, and the income benefits payable on account of the subsequent disability in
whole or in part would duplicate the income benefits payable on account of the pre-
existing disability.
(3) Subject to the limitations contained in subsection (4) of this section, when an
employee, who has sustained disability compensable under this chapter, and who
has filed, or could have timely filed, a valid claim in his or her lifetime, dies from
causes other than the injury before the expiration of the compensable period
specified, portions of the income benefits specified and unpaid at the individual's
death, whether or not accrued or due at his or her death, shall be paid, under an
award made before or after the death, for the period specified in this section, to and
for the benefit of the persons within the classes at the time of death and in the
proportions and upon the conditions specified in this section and in the order
named:
(a) To the widow or widower, if there is no child under the age of eighteen (18)
or incapable of self-support, benefits at fifty percent (50%) of the rate
specified in the award; or
(b) If there are both a widow or widower and such a child or children, to the
widow or widower, forty-five percent (45%) of the benefits specified in the
award, or forty percent (40%) of those benefits if such a child or children are
not living with the widow or widower; and, in addition thereto, fifteen percent
(15%) of the benefits specified in the award to each child. Where there are
more than two (2) such children, the indemnity benefits payable on account of
two (2) children shall be divided among all the children, share and share alike;
or
(c) If there is no widow or widower but such a child or children, then to the child
or children, fifty percent (50%) of the benefits specified in the award to one
(1) child, and fifteen percent (15%) of those benefits to a second child, to be
Page 50 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
shared equally. If there are more than two (2) such children, the indemnity
benefits payable on account of two (2) children shall be divided equally
among all the children; or
(d) If there is no survivor in the above classes, then the parent or parents wholly
or partly actually dependent for support upon the decedent, or to other wholly
or partly actually dependent relatives listed in paragraph (g) of subsection (1)
of KRS 342.750, or to both, in proportions that the commissioner provides by
administrative regulation.
(e) To the widow or widower upon remarriage, up to two (2) years, benefits as
specified in the award and proportioned under paragraphs (a) or (b) of this
subsection, if the proportioned benefits remain unpaid, to be paid in a lump
sum.
(4) All income benefits payable pursuant to this chapter shall terminate as of the date
upon which the employee reaches the age of seventy (70), or four (4) years after the
employee's injury or last exposure, whichever last occurs. In like manner all income
benefits payable pursuant to this chapter to spouses and dependents shall terminate
as of the date upon which the employee would have reached age seventy (70) or
four (4) years after the employee's date of injury or date of last exposure, whichever
last occurs.
(5) All income benefits pursuant to this chapter otherwise payable for temporary total
and permanent total disability shall not be offset by unemployment insurance
benefits paid for unemployment during the period of temporary total or permanent
total disability.
(6) All income benefits otherwise payable pursuant to this chapter shall be offset by
payments made under an exclusively employer-funded disability plan, exclusively
employer-funded disability retirement plan, exclusively employer-funded sickness
and accident plan, or salary continuation, which extends income benefits for the
Page 51 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
same disability covered by this chapter, except where the employer-funded plan
contains an internal offset provision for workers' compensation benefits which is
inconsistent with this provision.
(7) Income benefits otherwise payable pursuant to this chapter for temporary total
disability during the period the employee has returned to a light-duty or other
alternative job position shall be offset by an amount equal to the employee's gross
income minus applicable taxes during the period of light-duty work or work in an
alternative job position.
(8) If an employee receiving a permanent total disability award returns to work, that
employee shall notify the employer, payment obligor, insurance carrier, or special
fund as applicable.
(9) Income benefits otherwise payable pursuant to this chapter for temporary total
disability to a professional athlete under the direction and control of an employer
that is a professional team located in Kentucky, absent any collective bargaining
agreement, shall terminate no later than the date on which the contract for hire upon
which the employment is based expires, so long as the professional athlete has been
released to return to employment for which he or she has prior training or
experience.
Section 13. KRS 342.794 is amended to read as follows:
(1) The commissioner shall maintain a list of duly qualified "B" reader medical
professionals who[physicians who are licensed in the Commonwealth and] are
board-certified pulmonary specialists, currently certified by the National Institute of
Occupational Safety and Health (NIOSH) who have agreed to perform pulmonary
examinations, interpret chest X-rays, and review other medical evidence pursuant to
KRS 342.316 for a fee to be fixed by the commissioner and paid by the Kentucky
coal workers' pneumoconiosis fund or the carrier, whichever is the appropriate
payment obligor, the provisions of KRS 342.1242 notwithstanding, for claims filed
Page 52 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
on or before June 30, 2017, and by the employer for claims filed after June 30,
2017.
(2) "'B' reader" means a medical professional[physician] who has demonstrated
proficiency in evaluating chest roentgenograms for roentgenographic quality and in
the use of the ILO classification for interpreting chest roentgenograms for
pneumoconiosis and other diseases by taking and passing a specially designed
proficiency examination given on behalf of the National Institute of Occupational
Safety and Health (NIOSH) or by the Appalachian Laboratory for Occupational
Safety and Health (ALOSH), or successors.
(3) "Board-certified pulmonary specialist" means a medical professional[physician
licensed in the Commonwealth] who is board-certified in internal medicine with a
certification in the subspecialty of pulmonary medicine by the American Board of
Internal Medicine.
Section 14. KRS 342.122 is amended to read as follows:
(1) (a) For calendar year 1997 and for each calendar year thereafter, for the purpose
of funding and prefunding the liabilities of the special fund, financing the
administration and operation of the Kentucky Workers' Compensation
Funding Commission, and financing the expenditures for all programs in the
Department of Workers' Claims, Occupational Safety and Health Review
Commission, Workers' Compensation Nominating Committee, Department of
Workplace Standards, except expenditures for the Division of Wages and
Hours contained in the Department of Workplace Standards and the
proportional support for general administration and support based on an
approved indirect cost allocation plan within the Education and Labor
Cabinet, as reflected in the enacted budget of the Commonwealth and enacted
by the General Assembly, the funding commission shall impose a special fund
assessment rate of nine percent (9%) upon the amount of workers'
Page 53 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
compensation premiums received on and after January 1, 1997, through
December 31, 1997, by every insurance carrier writing workers' compensation
insurance in the Commonwealth, by every self-insured group operating under
the provisions of KRS 342.350(4) and Chapter 304, and against the premium,
as defined in KRS 342.0011, of every employer carrying his or her own risk.
(b) The funding commission shall, for calendar year 1998 and thereafter, establish
for the special fund an assessment rate to be assessed against all premium
received during that calendar year which shall produce enough revenue to
amortize on a level basis the unfunded liability of the special fund as of June
30 preceding January 1 of each year, for the period remaining until December
31, 2029. The interest rate to be used in this calculation shall reflect the
funding commission's investment experience to date and the current
investment policies of the commission. When the claim liabilities of the
special fund are fully funded or prefunded, the assessment shall continue
for the purpose of financing the administration, operation, and
expenditures established in paragraph (a) of this subsection. This
assessment shall be imposed upon the amount of workers' compensation
premiums received by every insurance carrier writing workers' compensation
insurance in the Commonwealth, by every self-insured group operating under
the provisions of KRS 342.350(4) and Chapter 304, and against the premium,
as defined in KRS 342.0011, of every employer carrying its own risk. On or
before October 1 of each year, the commission shall notify each insurance
carrier writing workers' compensation insurance in the Commonwealth, every
group of self-insured employers, and each employer carrying its own risk, of
the rates which shall become effective on January 1 of each year, unless
modified by the General Assembly.
(c) All assessments imposed by this section shall be paid to the Kentucky
Page 54 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
Workers' Compensation Funding Commission and shall be credited to the
benefit reserve fund within the Kentucky Workers' Compensation Funding
Commission.
(d) The assessments imposed in this chapter shall be in lieu of all other
assessments or taxes on workers' compensation premiums.
(2) (a) These assessments shall be paid quarterly not later than the thirtieth day of the
month following the end of the quarter in which the premium is received.
Receipt shall be considered timely through actual physical receipt or by
postmark of the United States Postal Service. Employers carrying their own
risk and employers defined in KRS 342.630(2) shall pay the annual
assessments in four (4) equal quarterly installments.
(b) Beginning on January 1, 2020, all assessments shall be electronically remitted
to the funding commission quarterly not later than the thirtieth day of the
month following the end of the quarter in which the premium is received.
Receipt shall be considered timely when filed and remitted using the
appropriate electronic pay system as prescribed by the funding commission.
Employers carrying their own risk and employers defined in KRS 342.630(2)
shall pay the annual assessments in four (4) equal quarterly installments.
(3) The assessments imposed by this section may be collected by the insurance carrier
from the insured. However, the insurance carrier shall not collect from the employer
any amount exceeding the assessments imposed pursuant to this section. If the
insurance carrier collects the assessment from an insured, the assessment shall be
collected at the same time and in the same proportion as the premium is collected.
The assessment for an insurance policy or other evidence of coverage providing a
deductible may be collected in accordance with this chapter on a premium amount
that equates to the premium that would have applied without the deductible. Each
statement from an insurance carrier presented to an insured reflecting premium and
Page 55 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
assessment amounts shall clearly identify and distinguish the amount to be paid for
premium and the amount to be paid for assessments. No insurance carrier shall
collect from an insured an amount in excess of the assessment percentages imposed
by this chapter. The assessment for an insurance policy or other evidence of
coverage providing a deductible may be collected in accordance with this chapter
on a premium amount that equates to the premium that would have applied without
the deductible. The percentages imposed by this chapter for an insurance policy
issued by an insurance company shall be those percentages in effect on the annual
effective date of the policy, regardless of the date that the premium is actually
received by the insurance company.
(4) A self-insured group may elect to report its premiums and to have its assessments
computed in the same manner as insurance companies. This election may not be
rescinded for at least ten (10) years, nor may this election be made a second time
for at least another ten (10) years, except that the board of directors of the funding
commission may, at its discretion, waive the ten (10) year ban on a case-by-case
basis after formal petition has been made to the funding commission by a self-
insured group.
(5) The funding commission, as part of the collection and auditing of the special fund
assessments required by this section, shall annually require each insurance carrier
and each self-insured group to provide a list of employers which it has insured or
which are members and the amount collected from each employer. Additionally, the
funding commission shall require each entity paying a special fund assessment to
report the SIC code for each employer and the amount of premium collected from
each SIC code. An insurance carrier or self-insured group may require its insureds
or members to furnish the SIC code for each of their employees. However, the
failure of any employer to furnish said codes shall not relieve the insurance carrier
or self-insured group from the obligation to furnish same to the funding
Page 56 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
commission. The Department of Workforce Development, Education and Labor
Cabinet, is hereby directed to make available the SIC codes assigned in its records
to specific employers to aid in the reporting and recording of the special fund
assessment data.
(6) Each self-insured employer, self-insured group, or insurance carrier shall provide
any information and submit any reports the Department of Revenue or the funding
commission may require to effectuate the provisions of this section. In addition, the
funding commission may enter reciprocal agreements with other governmental
agencies for the exchange of information necessary to effectuate the provisions of
this section.
(7) The special fund shall be required to maintain a central claim registry of all claims
to which it is named a party, giving each such claim a unique claim number and
thereafter recording the status of each claim on a current basis. The registry shall be
established by January 26, 1988, for all claims on which payments were made since
July 1, 1986, or which were pending adjudication since July 1, 1986, by audit of all
claim files in the possession of the special fund.
(8) The fund heretofore designated as the subsequent claim fund is abolished, and there
is substituted therefor the special fund as set out by this section, and all moneys and
properties owned by the subsequent claim fund are transferred to the special fund.
(9) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section or this chapter to the contrary,
the total amount of funds collected pursuant to the assessment rates adopted by the
funding commission shall not be limited to the provisions of this section.
(10) All assessment rates imposed for periods prior to January 1, 1997, under KRS
342.122 shall forever remain applicable to premiums received on policies with
effective dates prior to January 1, 1997, by every insurance carrier writing workers'
compensation insurance in the Commonwealth, by every self-insured group
operating under the provision of KRS 342.350(4) and Chapter 304, and against the
Page 57 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
premium, as defined in KRS 342.0011, of every employer carrying its own risk.
Section 15. KRS 342.610 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Every employer subject to this chapter shall be liable for compensation for injury,
occupational disease, or death without regard to fault as a cause of the injury,
occupational disease, or death.
(2) A contractor who subcontracts all or any part of a contract and his or her carrier
shall be liable for the payment of compensation to the employees of the
subcontractor unless the subcontractor primarily liable for the payment of such
compensation has secured the payment of compensation as provided for in this
chapter. Any contractor or his or her carrier who shall become liable for such
compensation may recover the amount of such compensation paid and necessary
expenses from the subcontractor primarily liable therefor. A person who contracts
with another:
(a) To have work performed consisting of the removal, excavation, or drilling of
soil, rock, or mineral, or the cutting or removal of timber from land; or
(b) To have work performed of a kind which is a regular or recurrent part of the
work of the trade, business, occupation, or profession of such person
shall for the purposes of this section be deemed a contractor, and such other person
a subcontractor. This subsection shall not apply to the owner or lessee of land
principally used for agriculture.
(3) Liability for compensation shall not apply to injury, occupational disease, or death
to the employee if the employee willfully intended to injure or kill himself, herself,
or another.
(4) If an employee knowingly introduced into his or her body a legal or illegal
intoxicating substance,[voluntarily introduced an illegal, nonprescribed substance
or substances or a prescribed substance or substances in amounts in excess of
prescribed amounts into his or her body detected in the blood, as measured by a
Page 58 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
scientifically reliable test, that could cause a disturbance of mental or physical
capacities, it shall be presumed that the illegal, nonprescribed substance or
substances or the prescribed substance or substances in amounts in excess of
prescribed amounts caused the injury, occupational disease, or death of the
employee and] liability for compensation shall not apply to the injury, occupational
disease, or death to the employee if the intoxicating substance is determined to be
the proximate cause of the injury, occupational disease, or death to the employee.
(5) If injury or death results to an employee through the deliberate intention of his or
her employer to produce such injury or death, the employee or the employee's
dependent as herein defined shall receive the amount provided in this chapter in a
lump sum to be used, if desired, to prosecute the employer. The dependents may
bring suit against the employer for any amount they desire. If injury or death results
to an employee through the deliberate intention of his or her employer to produce
such injury or death, the employee or the employee's dependents may take under
this chapter, or in lieu thereof, have a cause of action at law against the employer as
if this chapter had not been passed, for such damage so sustained by the employee,
his or her dependents or personal representatives as is recoverable at law. If a suit is
brought under this subsection, all right to compensation under this chapter shall
thereby be waived as to all persons. If a claim is made for the payment of
compensation or any other benefit provided by this chapter, all rights to sue the
employer for damages on account of such injury or death shall be waived as to all
persons.
(6) Prior to issuing any building permit pursuant to KRS 198B.060(10), every local
building official shall require proof of workers' compensation coverage from the
builder before a permit is issued. A person who is exempt under the exception
contained in KRS 342.650(2), and any contractor otherwise exempt from this
chapter, shall so certify to the local building official, in writing and on a form
Page 59 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 25 RS BR 1160
prescribed by the commissioner, in lieu of providing proof of workers'
compensation coverage.
(7) Every employer subject to this chapter, at its principal office and such other
locations where employees customarily report for payroll and personnel matters,
shall post a notice stating the name of its workers' compensation insurance carrier
and policy number, setting forth the means to access medical care for injuries, the
employee's obligation to give notice of accidents, and such other matters
concerning the employee's rights under this chapter as may be required by the
commissioner so as to afford every employee the opportunity to become informed
about the employer's workers' compensation program. The format and contents of
the notice shall be established by the commissioner through administrative
regulation, and copies shall be provided to the employer by its insurance carrier.
Page 60 of 60
XXXX 2/17/2025 2:52 PM Jacketed